Maryland, session 2025, HB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
3–306.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this article or the Public
Utilities Article, on application to the Public Service Commission for a certificate of public
convenience and necessity associated with power plant construction IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–207 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE, the Commission shall notify
immediately the Department [of Natural Resources] and the Department of the
Environment of the application.
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(b) (1) (i) [Unless] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, UNLESS a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, a person may not begin construction in
the State of:
1. a generating station; or
2. a qualified generator lead line.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(ii) [If a person obtains Commission approval for construction under
§ 7–207.1 of this subtitle, the Commission shall exempt a person from the requirement to
obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity under this section] A PERSON IS
NOT REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND
NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE PERSON OBTAINS:
1. COMMISSION APPROVAL FOR CONSTRUCTION UNDER
§ 7–207.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
2. A DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE OF
PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall provide an opportunity for public
comment and hold a public hearing on the application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity in each county and municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of a generating station, an overhead transmission line designed to carry a
voltage in excess of 69,000 volts, or a qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located.
(ii) The Commission may hold the public hearing virtually rather
than in person if the Commission provides a comparable opportunity for public comment
and participation in the hearing.
(2) The Commission shall hold the public hearing jointly with the
governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, overhead transmission line, or qualified generator
lead line is proposed to be located, unless the governing body declines to participate in the
hearing.
(3) (i) Once in each of the 4 successive weeks immediately before the
hearing date, the Commission shall provide weekly notice of the public hearing and an
opportunity for public comment:
1. by advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county or municipal corporation affected by the application;
2. on two types of social media; and
3. on the Commission’s website.
(ii) Before a public hearing, the Commission shall coordinate with
the governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, overhead transmission line, or qualified generator
lead line is proposed to be located to identify additional options for providing, in an efficient
and cost–effective manner, notice of the public hearing through other types of media that
are familiar to the residents of the county or municipal corporation.
– 3 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) (i) On the day of a public hearing, an informational sign shall be
posted prominently at or near each public entrance of the building in which the public
hearing will be held.
(ii) The informational sign required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall:
1. state the time, room number, and subject of the public
hearing; and
2. be at least 17 by 22 inches in size.
(iii) If the public hearing is conducted virtually rather than in person,
the Commission shall provide information on the hearing prominently on the Commission’s
website.
(5) (i) The Commission shall ensure presentation and
recommendations from each interested State unit, and shall allow representatives of each
State unit to sit during hearing of all parties.
(ii) The Commission shall allow each State unit 15 days after the
conclusion of the hearing to modify the State unit’s initial recommendations.
(e) The Commission shall take final action on an application for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity only after due consideration of:
(1) the recommendation of the governing body of each county or municipal
corporation in which any portion of the construction of the generating station, overhead
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located;
(2) the effect of the generating station, overhead transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line on:
(i) the stability and reliability of the electric system;
(ii) economics;
(iii) esthetics;
(iv) historic sites;
(v) aviation safety as determined by the Maryland Aviation
Administration and the administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration;
(vi) when applicable, air quality and water pollution; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(vii) the availability of means for the required timely disposal of
wastes produced by any generating station;
(3) the effect of climate change on the generating station, overhead
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line based on the best available scientific
information recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change; [and]
(4) for a generating station:
(i) the consistency of the application with the comprehensive plan
and zoning of each county or municipal corporation where any portion of the generating
station is proposed to be located;
(ii) the efforts to resolve any issues presented by a county or
municipal corporation where any portion of the generating station is proposed to be located;
(iii) the impact of the generating station on the quantity of annual
and long–term statewide greenhouse gas emissions, measured in the manner specified in §
2–1202 of the Environment Article and based on the best available scientific information
recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change; and
(iv) the consistency of the application with the State’s climate
commitments for reducing statewide greenhouse gas emissions, including those specified
in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article; AND
(5) FOR A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION SPECIFIED UNDER §
7–218 OF THIS SUBTITLE, WHETHER THE OWNER OF A PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION COMPLIES WITH THE SITE REQUIREMENTS OF UNDER §
7–218(F) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(h) (1) A county or municipal corporation has the authority to approve or deny
any local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under this section OR A DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY ISSUED UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A county or municipal corporation shall approve or deny any local
permits required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this
section OR A DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE
AND NECESSITY ISSUED UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(i) within a reasonable time; and
(ii) to the extent local laws are not preempted by State law, in
accordance with local laws.
– 5 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section OR A DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE
AND NECESSITY ISSUED UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE on receipt of any of the
following approvals for any aspect of a generating station, an overhead transmission line,
or a qualified lead line proposed to be constructed under the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.
7–207.1.
(c) (1) The Commission shall require a person that is exempted from the
requirement to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity UNDER §
7–207(B)(1)(II)1 OF THIS SUBTITLE to obtain approval from the Commission under this
section before the person may construct a generating station described in subsection (b) of
this section.
7–207.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY” OR “DGCPCN” MEANS A CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY
THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION THAT AUTHORIZES THE CONSTRUCTION
AND OPERATION OF A DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM.
(3) “DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” MEANS A
COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM, AS DEFINED IN § 7–306.2 OF
THIS TITLE, THAT:
(I) WOULD BE REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE SYSTEM
DOES NOT OBTAIN A DGCPCN UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) HAS A CAPACITY TO PRODUCE MORE THAN 2 MEGAWATTS
BUT NOT MORE THAN 5 MEGAWATTS OF ALTERNATING CURRENT AS MEASURED BY
THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE SYSTEM’S INVERTER; AND
(III) IS NOT LOCATED WITHIN A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(4) “FOREST” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–1601 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(5) “POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM” MEANS THE PROGRAM
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 3
OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(6) “STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS” MEANS THE
PREDETERMINED LICENSING CONDITIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
THIS SECTION FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF A DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT HAS BEEN ISSUED A DGCPCN UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(7) “STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS” MEANS THE
PREDETERMINED OBJECTIVE REQUIREMENTS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION
UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE SITING AND DESIGN OF A DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT HAS BEEN ISSUED A DGCPCN UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM, AFTER GIVING NOTICE AND OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT,
SHALL DEVELOP AND SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION PROPOSED STANDARD SITING
AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS AND PROPOSED STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS
FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A DGCPCN.
(2) IN DEVELOPING THE PROPOSED STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS AND THE PROPOSED STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS, THE
POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM SHALL:
(I) CONSIDER ACHIEVEMENT OF THE STATE’S CLIMATE AND
RENEWABLE ENERGY COMMITMENTS;
(II) CONSIDER REASONABLE SETBACKS AND LANDSCAPE
SCREENING REQUIREMENTS;
(III) CONSIDER ENVIRONMENTAL PRESERVATION, INCLUDING
PROHIBITIONS ON FOREST CLEARANCE EXCEPT WHERE NECESSARY TO:
1. REDUCE SOLAR PANEL SHADING NEAR THE
PERIMETER OF THE PROJECT SITE;
2. FACILITATE INTERCONNECTION INFRASTRUCTURE;
AND
– 7 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. ENSURE ADEQUATE SITE ACCESS;
(IV) CONSIDER STORMWATER MANAGEMENT, EROSION AND
SEDIMENT CONTROL, AND SITE STABILIZATION, ACCOUNTING FOR:
1. THE EFFECTS ON RUNOFF FROM SOLAR PANELS AND
ASSOCIATED EQUIPMENT;
2. THE EFFECTS OF SOIL CHARACTERISTICS AND
COMPACTION ON RUNOFF; AND
3. THE EFFECTS OF THE GROUND COVER UNDER AND
BETWEEN THE SOLAR PANELS ON RUNOFF;
(V) CONSIDER MINIMIZATION AND MITIGATION OF THE
EFFECTS OF A DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM ON HISTORIC
SITES;
(VI) CONSIDER PUBLIC SAFETY;
(VII) CONSIDER INDUSTRY BEST PRACTICES;
(VIII) CONSIDER ENSURING THE STABILITY AND RELIABILITY OF
THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM BY REQUIRING THE APPLICANT TO SUBMIT A SIGNED
INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT WITH THE ELECTRIC COMPANY BEFORE THE
START OF CONSTRUCTION;
(IX) CONSIDER LICENSING CONDITIONS PREVIOUSLY ADOPTED
BY THE COMMISSION FOR SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS, INCLUDING
REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO DECOMMISSIONING;
(X) ENSURE THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS ARE CONSISTENT WITH § 7–218 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(XI) CONSIDER ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DETERMINED
NECESSARY BY THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(I) IMPLEMENT STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS AND STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS FOR A DGCPCN;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(II) SPECIFY THE FORM OF THE APPLICATION FOR A
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM TO RECEIVE A DGCPCN AND
ANY APPLICATION FEE;
(III) SPECIFY THE COMMISSION’S PROCEDURE FOR PROCESSING
AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN; AND
(IV) ESTABLISH THE TIME PERIOD WITHIN WHICH THE POWER
PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM MUST MAKE THE DETERMINATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) CONSIDER THE PROPOSED STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS AND THE PROPOSED STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS
DEVELOPED BY THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM IN ADOPTING THE
REGULATIONS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) ENSURE REGULATIONS ADOPTED TO IMPLEMENT
STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS ARE CONSISTENT WITH § 7–218 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE POWER
PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM, MAY PERIODICALLY SOLICIT PUBLIC COMMENTS
REGARDING IMPROVEMENTS TO THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS AND STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS FOR A DGCPCN.
(II) THE PROCESS FOR SOLICITING PUBLIC COMMENTS UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE THE SAME AS THE PROCESS FOR
SOLICITING PUBLIC COMMENT REGARDING THE ADOPTION OF A REGULATION.
(4) (I) THE COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES MAY JOINTLY SET AN APPLICATION FEE FOR A DGCPCN APPLICATION
AT AN AMOUNT THAT THE COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES DETERMINE MAY OFFSET THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE
DGCPCN APPROVAL PROCESS THAT ARE INCURRED BY THE COMMISSION AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES.
(II) THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE BASED ON AN ESTIMATE OF THE NUMBER OF DGCPCN
APPLICATIONS THAT WILL BE FILED WITH THE COMMISSION EACH YEAR.
(D) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT BEGIN CONSTRUCTION OF A DISTRIBUTED
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNLESS:
– 9 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) A DGCPCN IS FIRST OBTAINED FROM THE COMMISSION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION; OR
(II) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
IS FIRST OBTAINED FROM THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION FOR A
DGCPCN TO THE COMMISSION, THE APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT A COPY OF THE
APPLICATION TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM IS PROPOSED TO BE LOCATED.
(3) WHEN A PERSON SUBMITS AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN TO
THE COMMISSION, THE PERSON SHALL SUBMIT A COPY OF THE APPLICATION TO THE
POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM.
(E) (1) AFTER RECEIVING AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN BUT
BEFORE A DETERMINATION IS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT AND HOLD
A PUBLIC HEARING ON AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN IN EACH COUNTY IN
WHICH ANY PORTION OF THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM IS PROPOSED TO BE LOCATED.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY HOLD THE PUBLIC HEARING VIRTUALLY
RATHER THAN IN PERSON IF THE COMMISSION PROVIDES A COMPARABLE
OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT AND PARTICIPATION IN THE HEARING.
(F) (1) AFTER AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN IS FILED WITH THE
COMMISSION AND WITHIN THE TIME PERIOD SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(1)(IV) OF THIS SECTION, THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM
SHALL:
(I) DETERMINE WHETHER THE DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM SATISFIES THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE DGCPCN; AND
(II) NOTIFY THE COMMISSION IN WRITING AS TO THE
DETERMINATION MADE UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING HOW AN
APPLICATION THAT IS DETERMINED NOT TO SATISFY THE STANDARD SITING AND
DESIGN REQUIREMENTS CAN CURE THE DEFICIENCY.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(2) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM SHALL CONSIDER PUBLIC
COMMENTS RECEIVED BY THE COMMISSION.
(G) (1) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM MAKES ITS DETERMINATION UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL SCHEDULE A HEARING TO CONSIDER THE
APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN.
(2) (I) AT THE HEARING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROPOSED
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM SATISFIES THE STANDARD
SITING AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE A DGCPCN TO AN
APPLICANT TO CONSTRUCT A PROPOSED DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM SUBJECT TO THE STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS IF THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE PROPOSED DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM SATISFIES THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS.
(III) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ISSUE A DGCPCN TO AN
APPLICANT IF THE PROPOSED DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
DOES NOT SATISFY EACH OF THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS.
(3) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER PUBLIC COMMENTS RECEIVED BY THE COMMISSION
UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(H) (1) A DGCPCN ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL REQUIRE THE PERSON CONSTRUCTING THE DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM TO OBTAIN THE FOLLOWING PERMITS AND APPROVALS FROM
THE COUNTY, MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, OR SOIL CONSERVATION DISTRICT IN
WHICH THE SYSTEM IS TO BE CONSTRUCTED:
(I) SITE PLAN APPROVAL;
(II) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PLAN APPROVAL;
(III) EROSION AND SEDIMENT CONTROL PLAN APPROVAL;
(IV) ALL APPLICABLE BUILDING AND ELECTRICAL PERMITS;
AND
– 11 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) ANY ADDITIONAL LOCAL PERMIT REQUIRED BY THE
STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS.
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF § 7–207(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL APPLY
TO ANY PERMITS AND APPROVALS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(I) A DGCPCN ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION HAS
THE SAME FORCE AND EFFECT AS A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND
NECESSITY ISSUED UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–218.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AGRIVOLTAICS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–306.2 OF THIS
TITLE.
(2) (3) “BROWNFIELDS SITE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) (4) “LOCAL JURISDICTION” INCLUDES COUNTIES, MUNICIPAL
CORPORATIONS, AND OTHER FORMS OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(5) “PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA” MEANS AN AREA CERTIFIED AS
A PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA UNDER § 2–518 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(6) (I) “PROJECT AREA” MEANS AN AREA WITHIN WHICH
CONSTRUCTION, MATERIALS AND EQUIPMENT STORAGE, GRADING, LANDSCAPING,
AND RELATED ACTIVITIES FOR A PROJECT MAY OCCUR.
(II) “PROJECT AREA” INCLUDES ONE OR MORE CONTIGUOUS
PARCELS OR PROPERTIES UNDER THE SAME OWNERSHIP OR LEASE AGREEMENT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
STATION THAT:
(1) HAS THE CAPACITY TO PRODUCE MORE THAN 2 MEGAWATTS 1
MEGAWATT OF ELECTRICITY AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING
OF THE SYSTEM’S STATION’S INVERTER;
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(2) (I) IS DESIGNED TO PRODUCE ELECTRICITY FOR SALE ON THE
WHOLESALE MARKET; OR
(II) IS A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
UNDER § 7–306.2 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(III) IS PART OF AGGREGATE NET METERING UNDER § 7–306.3
OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) IS NOT LOCATED ON A ROOFTOP, CARPORT, OR BROWNFIELDS
SITE OR BEHIND THE METER OF A RETAIL ELECTRIC CUSTOMER.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT BEGIN CONSTRUCTION OF A SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION UNLESS:
(1) THE CONSTRUCTION HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH OR, FOR A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION THAT HAS
THE CAPACITY TO PRODUCE NOT MORE THAN 2 MEGAWATTS OF ELECTRICITY AS
MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE STATION’S INVERTER,
THE LOCAL JURISDICTION VERIFIES THAT THE PROPOSED CONSTRUCTION MEETS
ALL OF THE SITE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) (I) FOR A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION THAT HAS THE
CAPACITY TO PRODUCE MORE THAN 2 MEGAWATTS OF ELECTRICITY AS MEASURED
BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE STATION’S INVERTER:
(I) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
HAS BEEN ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(II) A DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY HAS BEEN ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207.4
OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(III) THE CONSTRUCTION HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) THE CONSTRUCTION HAS RECEIVED APPROVAL FOR ALL LOCAL
PERMITS REQUIRED UNDER § 7–207(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL UNDER THIS SECTION,
THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE IMMEDIATE NOTICE OR REQUIRE THE
APPLICANT TO PROVIDE IMMEDIATE NOTICE OF THE APPLICATION TO:
– 13 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION IN WHICH ANY PORTION OF THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
STATION IS PROPOSED TO BE CONSTRUCTED;
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION WITHIN 1 MILE OF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION;
(3) EACH MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REPRESENTING ANY
PART OF A COUNTY IN WHICH ANY PORTION OF THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
STATION IS PROPOSED TO BE CONSTRUCTED;
(4) EACH MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REPRESENTING ANY
PART OF A COUNTY WITHIN 1 MILE OF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING STATION; AND
(5) THE RESIDENTS AND PROPERTY OWNERS WITHIN 1 MILE OF THE
PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION
(1) A PERSON THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL OF
THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–207, § 7–207.1, OR § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL INCLUDE WITH THE
APPLICATION WRITTEN DOCUMENTATION OR OTHER EVIDENCE SHOWING THAT THE
PROPOSED CONSTRUCTION MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (F)
AND (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) FOR A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION THAT HAS THE
CAPACITY TO PRODUCE NOT MORE THAN 2 MEGAWATTS OF ELECTRICITY AS
MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE STATION’S INVERTER,
A PERSON THAT SUBMITS A SITE DEVELOPMENT PLAN TO A LOCAL JURISDICTION
SHALL INCLUDE WITH THE PLAN WRITTEN DOCUMENTATION OR OTHER EVIDENCE
SHOWING THAT THE PROPOSED CONSTRUCTION MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (F) AND (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (E) (1) WHEN REVIEWING AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL UNDER
VERIFYING WHETHER THE DOCUMENTATION PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (F) AND (G) OF
THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION OR LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL:
(1) COMPLY WITH AND REQUIRE THE OWNER OF THE PROPOSED
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION TO COMPLY WITH § 7–207(D) OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(2), IF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION IS IN AN AREA CONSIDERED TO BE OVERBURDENED AND
UNDERSERVED, AS DEFINED IN § 1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, REQUIRE
THE PERSON CONSTRUCTING THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION TO HOLD
AT LEAST TWO PUBLIC MEETINGS IN THE COMMUNITY WHERE THE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION IS TO BE LOCATED TO COLLECT COMMUNITY FEEDBACK AND
PROVIDE OPPORTUNITIES TO ADDRESS COMMUNITY FEEDBACK.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
MEETINGS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE HELD:
1. IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROPOSED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING STATION IS TO BE LOCATED; AND
2. WITHIN 10 MILES OF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF
THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION.
(II) IF THE OWNER OF A PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION CANNOT FIND A MEETING LOCATION THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE OWNER MAY
SELECT AN ALTERNATIVE LOCATION THAT IS AS CLOSE AS PRACTICABLE TO THE
LOCATION OF THE PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION.
(F) (1) AN THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AGRIVOLTAICS.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (10) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN OWNER OF A PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION:
(I) SHALL PROVIDE A BOUNDARY OF 150 FEET BETWEEN THE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION AND ANY OCCUPIED BUILDINGS OR
DWELLINGS NOT AFFILIATED WITH THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION THE
NEAREST WALL OF A RESIDENTIAL DWELLING;
(II) SHALL PROVIDE A BOUNDARY OF 50 100 FEET BETWEEN
THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION AND ANY PARCELS OF LAND NOT
AFFILIATED WITH THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION ALL PROPERTY LINES,
NOT INCLUDING PROPERTY LINES THAT BISECT THE INTERIOR OF A PROJECT AREA;
(III) 1. SHALL PROVIDE NONBARBED WIRE FENCING:
A. AROUND THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION
ONLY ON THE INTERIOR OF A LANDSCAPE BUFFER OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT TO
A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION; AND
– 15 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. THAT IS NOT MORE THAN 20 FEET IN HEIGHT;
C. THAT IS ONLY BLACK OR GREEN VINYL WIRE MESH IF
THE OWNER PROPOSES TO USE CHAIN LINK FENCING; AND
D. THAT IS NOT LESS THAN 50 FEET AWAY FROM THE
EDGE OF ANY PUBLIC ROAD RIGHT–OF–WAY; AND
2. MAY USE BARBED WIRE FENCING AROUND THE
SUBSTATIONS OR OTHER CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE FOR PROTECTION OF THAT
INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(IV) SHALL PROVIDE FOR A LANDSCAPING BUFFER OR
VEGETATIVE SCREENING IF REQUIRED BY THE LOCAL JURISDICTION. IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(V) EXCEPT FOR EQUIPMENT REQUIRED FOR
INTERCONNECTION WITH ELECTRIC SYSTEM INFRASTRUCTURE, MAY NOT LOCATE
ANY SOLAR ARRAY, ANCILLARY EQUIPMENT, OR ACCESSORY BUILDINGS OR
FACILITIES WITHIN A PUBLIC ROAD RIGHT–OF–WAY;
(VI) 1. SHALL MITIGATE THE VISUAL IMPACT OF THE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING STATION ON A PRESERVATION AREA, RURAL LEGACY AREA,
PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA, PUBLIC PARK, SCENIC RIVER OR BYWAY,
DESIGNATED HERITAGE AREA, OR HISTORIC STRUCTURE OR SITE LISTED ON OR
ELIGIBLE FOR THE NATIONAL REGISTER OF HISTORIC PLACES OR RELEVANT
COUNTY REGISTER OF HISTORIC PLACES; AND
2. A. FOR A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION
THAT HAS THE CAPACITY TO PRODUCE MORE THAN 2 MEGAWATTS OF ELECTRICITY
AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT OF THE STATION’S INVERTER, SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS
SECTION A VIEWSHED ANALYSIS FOR ANY AREA, STRUCTURE, OR SITE SPECIFIED IN
ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM; AND
B. FOR A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION THAT
HAS THE CAPACITY TO PRODUCE NOT MORE THAN 2 MEGAWATTS OF ELECTRICITY
AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT OF THE STATION’S INVERTER, SHALL
INCLUDE IN AN APPLICATION FOR A SITE DEVELOPMENT PLAN A VIEWSHED
ANALYSIS FOR ANY AREA, STRUCTURE, OR SITE SPECIFIED IN ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM;
AND
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(VII) SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF EACH PROPOSED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING STATION TO THE EMERGENCY RESPONSE SERVICES OF EACH
COUNTY IN WHICH ANY PORTION OF THE GENERATING STATION IS TO BE
CONSTRUCTED, INCLUDING A MAP OF THE PROPOSED GENERATING STATION AND
THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF ANY SOLAR COLLECTOR OR ISOLATOR SWITCH.
(2) (3) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT REQUIRE THE USE OF A
BERM FOR A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION APPROVED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(3) (4) THE BUFFER OR VEGETATIVE SCREENING REQUIRED IN
PARAGRAPH (1)(IV) (2)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE NOT MORE THAN 25 FEET IN DEPTH;
(II) PROVIDE FOR FOUR–SEASON VISUAL SCREENING OF THE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM;
(III) INCLUDE MULTILAYERED, STAGGERED ROWS OF
OVERSTORY AND UNDERSTORY TREES; AND
(IV) BE PLANTED WITH NOT MORE THAN 10 TREES PER 100
LINEAR FEET, WITH A MAXIMUM HEIGHT AT PLANTING OF 6 FEET BE NOT MORE
THAN 35 FEET WIDE;
(II) BE PROVIDED ALONG:
1. ALL PROPERTY LINES;
2. LOCATIONS OF THE EXTERIOR BOUNDARY FOR THE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION WHERE EXISTING WOODED VEGETATION OF
50 FEET OR MORE IN WIDTH DOES NOT EXIST; OR
3. AN ALTERNATIVE LOCATION WITHIN THE BOUNDARY
FOR THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION IF THE OWNER DEMONSTRATES
THAT THE ALTERNATIVE LOCATION WOULD MAXIMIZE THE VISUAL SCREENING;
(III) PROVIDE FOR FOUR–SEASON VISUAL SCREENING OF THE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION;
(IV) BE PLACED BETWEEN ANY FENCING AND THE PUBLIC VIEW;
(V) INCLUDE MULTILAYERED, STAGGERED ROWS OF
OVERSTORY AND UNDERSTORY TREES AND SHRUBS THAT:
– 17 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. ARE A MIXTURE OF EVERGREEN AND DECIDUOUS
VEGETATION;
2. ARE PREDOMINANTLY NATIVE TO THE REGION;
3. ARE MORE THAN 4 FEET IN HEIGHT AT PLANTING;
4. ARE DESIGNED TO PROVIDE SCREENING OR
BUFFERING WITHIN 5 YEARS OF PLANTING;
5. MAY NOT BE TRIMMED TO STUNT UPWARD OR
OUTWARD GROWTH OR TO OTHERWISE LIMIT THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE VISUAL
SCREEN;
6. CONFORM TO THE PLANT SIZE SPECIFICATIONS
ESTABLISHED BY THE AMERICAN STANDARD FOR NURSERY STOCK (ANSI Z60.1);
AND
7. ARE SPECIFIED IN A LANDSCAPING PLAN PREPARED
BY A QUALIFIED PROFESSIONAL LANDSCAPE ARCHITECT;
(VI) BE INSTALLED AS EARLY IN THE CONSTRUCTION PROCESS
AS PRACTICABLE AND BEFORE THE ACTIVATION OF THE PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION;
(VII) PRESERVE TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND
SUPPLEMENTED WITH NEW PLANTINGS WHERE NECESSARY, ANY FOREST OR
HEDGEROW THAT EXISTS AT A LOCATION WHERE VISUAL SCREENING OR
LANDSCAPE BUFFERING IS REQUIRED; AND
(VIII) SHALL BE MAINTAINED WITH A 90% SURVIVAL THRESHOLD
FOR THE LIFE OF THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION THROUGH A
MAINTENANCE AGREEMENT THAT INCLUDES A WATERING PLAN.
(4) (5) WITH RESPECT TO THE SITE ON WHICH A SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION IS PROPOSED FOR CONSTRUCTION, THE OWNER OF THE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION:
(I) SHALL MINIMIZE GRADING TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT
POSSIBLE;
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(II) MAY NOT REMOVE TOPSOIL FROM THE PARCEL, BUT MAY
MOVE OR TEMPORARILY STOCKPILE TOPSOIL FOR GRADING;
(III) TO MAINTAIN SOIL INTEGRITY, SHALL PLANT NATIVE OR
NONINVASIVE NATURALIZED VEGETATION AND OTHER APPROPRIATE VEGETATIVE
PROTECTIONS THAT HAVE A 90% SURVIVAL THRESHOLD FOR THE FIRST 3 YEARS OF
THE LIFE OF THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION;
(IV) SHALL LIMIT MOWING AND OTHER UNNECESSARY
LANDSCAPING;
(V) MAY NOT USE HERBICIDES EXCEPT TO CONTROL INVASIVE
SPECIES IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE’S WEED
CONTROL PROGRAM; AND
(VI) SHALL POST FOR THE FIRST 3 5 YEARS OF THE LIFE OF THE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION A LANDSCAPING BOND EQUAL TO 50% 100%
OF THE TOTAL LANDSCAPING COST WITH THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION IS LOCATED.
(5) (6) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL HOLD ANY LANDSCAPING BOND
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (5)(VI) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR 5 YEARS.
(II) A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL RELEASE 50% OF THE
LANDSCAPING BOND IF, ON INSPECTION, THE VEGETATIVE PROTECTIONS MEET A
90% SURVIVAL THRESHOLD.
(III) FOLLOWING THE RELEASE OF A LANDSCAPING BOND
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE REMAINING LANDSCAPING
BOND SHALL BE HELD FOR AN ADDITIONAL 2 YEARS AND, ON FURTHER INSPECTION
AND CONFIRMATION THAT THE VEGETATIVE PROTECTIONS CONTINUE TO MEET A
90% SURVIVAL THRESHOLD, SHALL BE RELEASED.
(7) EXCEPT AS REQUIRED BY LAW, OR FOR SAFETY OR EMERGENCY,
THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION MAY NOT EMIT VISIBLE LIGHT DURING
DUSK TO DAWN OPERATIONS.
(8) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO:
1. EQUIPMENT NECESSARY FOR INTERCONNECTION
WITH THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM; OR
– 19 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATIONS LOCATED ON
LAND THAT IS ALSO USED FOR AGRICULTURAL PURPOSES.
(II) A PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION AND
ANY ACCESSORY STRUCTURES ASSOCIATED WITH THE STATION MUST HAVE AN
AVERAGE HEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 15 FEET.
(9) SETBACKS FOR SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATIONS:
(I) SHALL BE MEASURED FROM THE PROPERTY BOUNDARY TO
THE NEAREST SOLAR ARRAY OR ACCESSORY EQUIPMENT, BUILDINGS, OR
FACILITIES THAT GENERATE, MAINTAIN, OPERATE, MANAGE, DISTRIBUTE, AND
TRANSMIT ELECTRICITY; AND
(II) MAY NOT APPLY TO ANY INTERCONNECTION TIE LINE OR
FACILITY THAT CONNECTS A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION TO THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(10) (I) THE OWNER OF A PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
STATION MAY PROVIDE TO THE COMMISSION OR LOCAL JURISDICTION WRITTEN
DOCUMENTATION OF A SITING AGREEMENT:
1. ENTERED INTO WITH THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE
PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION IS TO BE LOCATED; AND
2. THAT PROVIDES LESS STRINGENT RESTRICTIONS
THAN THOSE SPECIFIED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) IF A PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION
PROVIDES TO THE COMMISSION OR LOCAL JURISDICTION WRITTEN
DOCUMENTATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
THE PROPOSED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION SHALL BE CONSIDERED AS
MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(G) AN OWNER OF A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION:
(1) SHALL ENTER INTO A DECOMMISSIONING AGREEMENT WITH THE
COMMISSION ON A FORM THAT THE COMMISSION PROVIDES;
(2) SHALL POST A SURETY BOND WITH THE COMMISSION FOR NOT
MORE THAN 100% 125% OF THE ESTIMATED FUTURE COST OF DECOMMISSIONING
THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION AND ITS RELATED INFRASTRUCTURE,
LESS ANY SALVAGE VALUE; AND
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(3) SHALL EXECUTE A SECURITIZATION BOND TRUE–UP EVERY 5
YEARS.
(H) (1) A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT:
(I) ADOPT ZONING LAWS OR OTHER LAWS OR REGULATIONS
THAT PROHIBIT THE CONSTRUCTION OR OPERATION OF SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATIONS; OR
(II) DENY SITE DEVELOPMENT PLANS FOR SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATIONS THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (F) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL:
(I) EXPEDITE THE REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF SITE
DEVELOPMENT PLANS FOR SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATIONS IF THOSE PLANS
MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) FOR SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATIONS WITH A
GENERATING CAPACITY OF NOT MORE THAN 5 MEGAWATTS, AS MEASURED BY THE
ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION’S
INVERTER, PROCESS THE SITE DEVELOPMENT PLAN APPLICATION AS A PERMITTED
USE SUBJECT TO THE REVIEW STANDARDS IN § 4–205 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
(3) A GROUND MOUNTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION WITH
A GENERATING CAPACITY OF MORE THAN 5 MEGAWATTS, AS MEASURED BY THE
ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION’S
INVERTER, MAY NOT BE LOCATED ON ANY LOT, PARCEL, OR TRACT OF LAND THAT,
AS OF JANUARY 1, 2025, IS LOCATED WITHIN:
(I) A TIER 1 OR TIER 2 MAPPED LOCALLY DESIGNATED
GROWTH AREA ADOPTED UNDER § 1–506 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE;
(II) A MEDIUM DENSITY RESIDENTIAL AREA OR HIGH DENSITY
RESIDENTIAL AREA, AS DEFINED IN § 5–1601 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE; OR
(III) A MIXED–USE AREA WITH A RESIDENTIAL COMPONENT.
(4) (I) THE TOTAL COMBINED NUMBER OF SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATIONS THAT MAY BE APPROVED FOR CONSTRUCTION IN A
– 21 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA THAT WAS ESTABLISHED BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025,
SHALL:
1. BE LIMITED IN AREA TO 5% OF THE TOTAL ACREAGE
OF THE PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA;
2. BE LOCATED IN THE PROJECT AREA WITHIN THE
PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA; AND
3. MEET ALL REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) THE PROHIBITIONS IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO THE REMAINING 95% OF A PRIORITY PRESERVATION
AREA ONCE THE 5% LIMITATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
HAS BEEN ACHIEVED FOR THE PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA.
(III) A COUNTY SHALL REPORT TO THE COMMISSION WHEN THE
5% LIMITATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH HAS BEEN
ACHIEVED FOR A PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA.
(I) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION IS EXEMPT FROM PERSONAL AND REAL
PROPERTY TAXES.
(2) A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION MAY BE REQUIRED BY A
LOCAL JURISDICTION TO MAKE A PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES UP TO $5,000 PER
MEGAWATT OF ENERGY GENERATED FROM THE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
STATION.
(J) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO ADD ANY
ADDITIONAL LIMITATIONS TO THE AUTHORITY OF THE COMMISSION IN THE
APPROVAL PROCESS FOR AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY.
7–219.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–216 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(3) “LOCAL JURISDICTION” INCLUDES COUNTIES, MUNICIPAL
CORPORATIONS, AND OTHER FORMS OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT BEGIN CONSTRUCTION OF AN A
FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE UNLESS THE CONSTRUCTION
HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL OF THE
CONSTRUCTION OF ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES A FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE
IMMEDIATE NOTICE OR REQUIRE THE APPLICANT TO PROVIDE IMMEDIATE NOTICE
OF THE APPLICATION TO:
(1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION IN WHICH ANY PORTION OF THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE IS
PROPOSED TO BE CONSTRUCTED;
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION WITHIN 1 MILE OF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICE;
(3) EACH MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REPRESENTING ANY
PART OF A COUNTY IN WHICH ANY PORTION OF THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE IS
PROPOSED TO BE CONSTRUCTED;
(4) EACH MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REPRESENTING ANY
PART OF A COUNTY WITHIN 1 MILE OF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICE; AND
(5) THE RESIDENTS AND OWNERS OF PROPERTY THAT IS AFFECTED
COMMUNITIES THAT ARE WITHIN 1 MILE OF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE.
(D) WHEN REVIEWING AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) IF THE PROJECT WILL STORE MORE THAN 100 KILOWATTS,
COMPLY WITH AND REQUIRE THE APPLICANT TO COMPLY WITH § 7–207(D) OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(2) IF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE FRONT–OF–THE–METER
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE IS IN AN AREA CONSIDERED TO BE OVERBURDENED AND
UNDERSERVED, AS DEFINED IN § 1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, REQUIRE
– 23 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THE APPLICANT TO HOLD AT LEAST TWO PUBLIC MEETINGS IN THE COMMUNITY
WHERE THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE IS TO BE LOCATED; AND
(3) (2) EXEMPT AN A FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICE THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF AN EXISTING ELECTRICITY
GENERATING STATION FROM THE MEETING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) AN OWNER OF A PROPOSED FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICE THAT WILL NOT BE CONSTRUCTED AT A COMMERCIAL OR
INDUSTRIAL LOCATION:
(I) 1. SHALL PROVIDE NONBARBED WIRE FENCING:
A. AROUND THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE; AND
B. THAT IS NOT MORE THAN 20 FEET IN HEIGHT; AND
2. MAY USE BARBED WIRE FENCING AROUND THE
SUBSTATIONS OR OTHER CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE FOR PROTECTION OF THAT
INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(II) SHALL PROVIDE FOR A LANDSCAPING BUFFER OR
VEGETATIVE SCREENING IF REQUIRED BY THE LOCAL JURISDICTION.
(2) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT REQUIRE THE USE OF A BERM
FOR AN A FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE APPROVED UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(3) THE BUFFER REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE NOT MORE THAN 25 FEET IN DEPTH; AND
(II) PROVIDE FOR FOUR–SEASON VISUAL SCREENING OF THE
FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE.
(4) WITH RESPECT TO THE SITE ON WHICH AN A
FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE IS PROPOSED FOR
CONSTRUCTION, THE OWNER OF THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE:
(I) SHALL MINIMIZE GRADING TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT
POSSIBLE;
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(II) MAY NOT REMOVE TOPSOIL FROM THE PARCEL, BUT MAY
MOVE OR TEMPORARILY STOCKPILE TOPSOIL FOR GRADING; AND
(III) MAY NOT USE HERBICIDES EXCEPT TO CONTROL INVASIVE
SPECIES IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE’S WEED
CONTROL PROGRAM.
(F) (1) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT:
(I) ADOPT ZONING LAWS OR OTHER LAWS OR REGULATIONS
THAT PROHIBIT THE CONSTRUCTION OR OPERATION OF FRONT–OF–THE–METER
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES; OR
(II) DENY SITE DEVELOPMENT PLANS FOR
FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES THAT MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL:
(I) EXPEDITE THE REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF SITE
DEVELOPMENT PLANS FOR FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES IF
THOSE PLANS MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) ADOPT STANDARD PROCESSES FOR THE REVIEW AND
APPROVAL OF SITE DEVELOPMENT PLANS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF
FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
(G) THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE OR MODIFY THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (C), (D), AND (E) OF THIS SECTION FOR GOOD CAUSE.
(H) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
7–306.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (I) “Agrivoltaics” means the simultaneous use of areas of land:
1. THAT ARE MAINTAINED IN AGRICULTURAL USE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH COMAR 18.02.03 OR THE MARYLAND ASSESSMENT
PROCEDURES MANUAL; AND
2. for both solar power generation and:
– 25 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) A. raising grains, fruits, herbs, melons, mushrooms, nuts,
seeds, tobacco, or vegetables;
(ii) B. raising poultry, including chickens and turkeys, for meat
or egg production;
(iii) C. dairy production, such as the raising of milking cows;
(iv) D. raising livestock, including cattle, sheep, goats, or pigs;
(v) E. horse boarding, breeding, or training;
(vi) F. turf farming;
(vii) G. raising ornamental shrubs, plants, or flowers, including
aquatic plants;
(viii) H. aquaculture;
(ix) I. silviculture; or
(x) J. any other activity recognized by the Department of
Agriculture as an agricultural activity UNDER COMAR 18.02.03 OR THE MARYLAND
ASSESSMENT PROCEDURES MANUAL.
(II) “AGRIVOLTAICS” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE SIMULTANEOUS
USE OF AREAS OF LAND FOR BOTH SOLAR POWER GENERATION AND:
1. APIARIES; OR
2. POLLINATOR HABITAT.
(3) “AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT” MEANS A COMMUNITY
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM:
(I) IN WHICH ALL OR A PORTION OF THE SUBSCRIBERS ARE
AUTOMATICALLY ENROLLED; AND
(II) 1. THAT IS OWNED AND OPERATED BY A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT; OR
2. FOR WHICH A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR ITS DESIGNEE
SERVES AS THE SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR.
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(4) (3) “Baseline annual usage” means:
(i) a subscriber’s accumulated electricity use in kilowatt–hours for
the 12 months before the subscriber’s most recent subscription; or
(ii) for a subscriber that does not have a record of 12 months of
electricity use at the time of the subscriber’s most recent subscription, an estimate of the
subscriber’s accumulated 12 months of electricity use in kilowatt–hours, determined in a
manner the Commission approves.
[(4)] (5) “Community solar energy generating system” means a solar
energy system that:
(i) is connected to the electric distribution [grid] SYSTEM serving
the State;
(ii) is located in the same electric service territory as its subscribers;
(iii) is attached to the electric meter of a subscriber or is a separate
facility with its own electric meter;
(iv) credits its generated electricity, or the value of its generated
electricity, to the bills of the subscribers to that system through virtual net energy
metering;
(v) has at least two subscribers but no limit to the maximum number
of subscribers;
(vi) does not have subscriptions larger than 200 kilowatts
constituting more than 60% of its kilowatt–hour output;
(vii) has a generating capacity that does not exceed 5 megawatts as
measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter;
(viii) may be owned by any person; and
(ix) with respect to community solar energy generating systems
constructed under the Program, serves at least 40% of its kilowatt–hour output to LMI
subscribers unless the solar energy system is wholly owned by the subscribers to the solar
energy system.
[(5)] (6) “Consolidated billing” means a payment mechanism that
requires an electric company to, at the request of a subscriber organization or subscription
coordinator:
– 27 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) include the monthly subscription charge of a subscriber
organization or subscription coordinator on the monthly bills rendered by the electric
company for electric service and supply to subscribers; and
(ii) remit payment for those charges to the subscriber organization
or subscription coordinator.
[(6)] (7) “Critical area” has the meaning stated in § 8–1802 of the Natural
Resources Article.
[(7)] (8) “LMI subscriber” means a subscriber that:
(i) is low–income;
(ii) is moderate–income; or
(iii) resides in a census tract that is [an]:
1. AN overburdened community; and
2. AN underserved community.
(9) “LOCAL GOVERNMENT” MEANS:
(I) A COUNTY; OR
(II) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
[(8)] (10) “Low–income” means:
(i) having an annual household income that is at or below 200% of
the federal poverty level; or
(ii) being certified as eligible for any federal, State, or local
assistance program that limits participation to households whose income is at or below
200% of the federal poverty level.
[(9)] (11) “Moderate–income” means having an annual household income
that is at or below 80% of the median income for Maryland.
[(10)] (12) “Overburdened community” has the meaning stated in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
[(11)] (13) “Pilot program” means the program established under this
section before July 1, 2023, and effective until the start of the Program established under
subsection (d)(20) of this section.
[(12)] (14) “Program” means the Community Solar Energy Generating
Systems Program.
[(13)] (15) “Queue” means:
(i) the pilot program queue an electric company is required to
maintain under COMAR 20.62.03.04; and
(ii) a queue an electric company may be required to maintain under
the Program.
[(14)] (16) “Subscriber” means a retail customer of an electric company that:
(i) holds a subscription to a community solar energy generating
system; and
(ii) has identified one or more individual meters or accounts to which
the subscription shall be attributed.
[(15)] (17) “Subscriber organization” means:
(i) a person that owns or operates a community solar energy
generating system; or
(ii) the collective group of subscribers of a community solar energy
generating system.
[(16)] (18) “Subscription” means the portion of the electricity generated by
a community solar energy generating system that is credited to a subscriber.
[(17)] (19) “Subscription coordinator” means a person that:
(i) markets community solar energy generating systems or
otherwise provides services related to community solar energy generating systems under
its own brand name;
(ii) performs any administrative action to allocate subscriptions,
connect subscribers with community solar energy generating systems, or enroll customers
in the Program; or
(iii) manages interactions between a subscriber organization and an
electric company or electricity supplier relating to subscribers.
– 29 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(18)] (20) “Underserved community” has the meaning stated in § 1–701 of
the Environment Article.
[(19)] (21) “Unsubscribed energy” means any community solar energy
generating system output in kilowatt–hours that is not allocated to any subscriber.
[(20)] (22) “Virtual net energy metering” means measurement of the
difference between the kilowatt–hours or value of electricity that is supplied by an electric
company and the kilowatt–hours or value of electricity attributable to a subscription to a
community solar energy generating system and fed back to the electric grid over the
subscriber’s billing period, as calculated under the tariffs established under subsections
(e)(2), (f)(2), and (g)(2) of this section.
(c) A community solar energy generating system, subscriber, subscriber
organization, or subscription coordinator is not:
(1) an electric company;
(2) an electricity supplier; or
(3) a generating station if:
(I) the generating capacity of the community solar energy
generating system does not exceed 2 megawatts; OR
(II) THE COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM IS
LOCATED ON THE ROOFTOP OF A BUILDING.
(d) (7) (I) Any unsubscribed energy generated by a community solar energy
generating system that is not owned by an electric company shall CREATE BANKED BILL
CREDITS TRACKED BY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT, WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE
DATE THAT THE BANKED BILL CREDIT WAS CREATED, MAY BE ALLOCATED TO ONE
OR MORE SUBSCRIBERS BY THE SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION OR SUBSCRIPTION
COORDINATOR ASSOCIATED WITH THE COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM.
(II) THE GENERATION ASSOCIATED WITH A BANKED BILL
CREDIT NOT ALLOCATED TO A SUBSCRIBER WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE THAT
THE BANKED BILL CREDIT WAS CREATED SHALL be purchased under the electric
company’s process for purchasing the output from qualifying facilities at the amount it
would have cost the electric company to procure the energy.
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(O) (1) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY ESTABLISH A COMMUNITY SOLAR
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROGRAM BY SUBMITTING TO THE COMMISSION A LOCAL
LAW, A CONTRACT, OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE APPROVAL THAT:
(I) STATES WHETHER:
1. THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT WILL OWN AND OPERATE
ONE OR MORE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECTS; OR
2. THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR ITS DESIGNEE WILL
SERVE AS THE SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR FOR ONE OR MORE AUTOMATIC
ENROLLMENT PROJECTS OWNED BY A THIRD PARTY; AND
(II) DESCRIBES THE MECHANISM BY WHICH THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT INTENDS TO ENROLL CUSTOMERS.
(2) AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT SHALL UTILIZE
CONSOLIDATED BILLING AND PROVIDE A GUARANTEED BILL CREDIT DISCOUNT TO
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT SUBSCRIBERS.
(3) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH A DESIGNEE TO
IDENTIFY AND MANAGE THE SUBSCRIPTIONS TO AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT
PROJECT.
(4) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR ITS DESIGNEE SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE
FOR IDENTIFYING THE CUSTOMERS THAT WILL BE AUTOMATICALLY ENROLLED FOR
A SUBSCRIPTION TO THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT, SUBJECT TO THE
FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:
(I) AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT SUBSCRIBERS MUST BE
RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS, INCLUDING CUSTOMERS RESIDING IN MULTIFAMILY
DWELLING UNITS;
(II) AT LEAST 51% OF AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT SUBSCRIBERS
MUST BE LMI SUBSCRIBERS;
(III) ALL CUSTOMERS SELECTED TO BE AUTOMATICALLY
ENROLLED AS SUBSCRIBERS TO THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT MUST BE
WITHIN THE SERVICE TERRITORY OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY WHERE THE
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED;
(IV) SUBSCRIBERS MAY DECLINE OR OPT OUT FROM A
SUBSCRIPTION TO THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT AT ANY TIME;
– 31 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT SUBSCRIBERS MAY SUBMIT A
REQUEST TO OPT OUT OF A SUBSCRIPTION BY PHONE, IN WRITING, OR ONLINE
THROUGH A WEBSITE MAINTAINED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR ITS DESIGNEE;
AND
(VI) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT CHARGE A FEE OR
PENALTY FOR ENROLLMENT IN OR EXITING FROM AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT
PROJECT.
(5) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR ITS DESIGNEE MAY VERIFY THE
INCOME OF A PROSPECTIVE SUBSCRIBER FOR ELIGIBILITY AS AN LMI SUBSCRIBER
USING ONE OF THE FOLLOWING METHODS:
(I) THE LOCATION OF THE PROSPECTIVE SUBSCRIBER IN AN
OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY OR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY;
(II) A FORM OF VERIFICATION AUTHORIZED UNDER
SUBSECTION (F)(1)(IV) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(III) ANY OTHER METHOD SELECTED BY THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT.
(6) AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE SUBSCRIBERS BEGIN RECEIVING
THEIR FIRST BILL CREDITS, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR ITS DESIGNEE SHALL
PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT TO ALL SELECTED
SUBSCRIBERS VIA DELIVERY BY THE U.S. POSTAL SERVICE.
(7) THE NOTICE REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A STATEMENT THAT THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAS
ESTABLISHED AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT;
(II) A STATEMENT THAT THE PROSPECTIVE SUBSCRIBER HAS
THE RIGHT TO OPT OUT OF THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT AT ANY TIME,
BUT IF NO OPT–OUT REQUEST IS RECEIVED, THE PROSPECTIVE SUBSCRIBER WILL
BE AUTOMATICALLY ENROLLED IN THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT;
(III) AN EXPLANATION OF THE CONSOLIDATED BILLING
PROCEDURES OF THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT;
(IV) DETAILED INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO SUBMIT AN OPT–OUT
REQUEST; AND
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(V) A CONTACT NAME, PHONE NUMBER, AND E–MAIL ADDRESS
FOR SUBSCRIBER INQUIRIES AND COMPLAINTS.
(8) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL FACILITATE THE ESTABLISHMENT
OF AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT FOR WHICH A LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAS
SUBMITTED THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION BY:
(I) PROVIDING ACCESS TO:
1. THE HISTORIC BILLING USAGE OF CUSTOMERS THAT
MAY BE AUTOMATICALLY ENROLLED IN THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT;
2. POINT–OF–SERVICE DELIVERY FOR CUSTOMERS
THAT MAY BE AUTOMATICALLY ENROLLED IN THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT
PROJECT;
3. PARTICIPATION IN ENERGY ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS;
4. SUBSCRIPTIONS TO COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS;
5. ACCOUNT NUMBERS FOR CUSTOMERS THAT MAY BE
AUTOMATICALLY ENROLLED IN THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT, IF
APPLICABLE; AND
6. ANY OTHER REASONABLE INFORMATION REQUIRED
BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OF ITS DESIGNEE TO ENROLL CUSTOMERS IN AN
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT; AND
(II) ENROLLING THE CUSTOMERS IDENTIFIED BY THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OR ITS DESIGNEE AS SUBSCRIBERS TO AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT
PROJECT AT THE SUBSCRIPTION SIZE IDENTIFIED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR
ITS DESIGNEE.
(9) THE ENROLLMENT AND MANAGEMENT OF AUTOMATIC
ENROLLMENT SUBSCRIBERS TO AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROJECT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO COMAR 20.62.05.
7–320.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO RESIDENTIAL ROOFTOP SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS.
– 33 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) A SELLER OR LESSOR OF RESIDENTIAL ROOFTOP SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE TO THE BUYER OR LESSEE A 5–YEAR FULL WARRANTY
ON THE INSTALLATION AND COMPONENT PARTS OF THE SYSTEM;
(2) INCLUDE ANY MANUFACTURER’S WARRANTIES FOR ANY OF THE
PRODUCTS OR COMPONENTS OF THE SYSTEM;
(3) INFORM THE BUYER OR LESSEE OF THE MINIMUM LEVEL OF
WEATHER–ADJUSTED ENERGY PRODUCTION THE BUYER OR LESSEE MAY EXPECT
FROM THE SYSTEM; AND
(4) CERTIFY, IN WRITING, THAT INSTALLATION OF THE SYSTEM IS
COMPLIANT WITH ALL FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL LAWS REGARDING
WORKMANSHIP AND THAT THE SOLAR PANELS, INVERTERS, RACKING SYSTEMS, AND
ALL OTHER COMPONENTS MEET THE MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR PRODUCT DESIGN.
(C) THE COMMISSION AND THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP TECHNICAL SAFETY STANDARDS A SPECIAL SOLAR
CONTRACTOR LICENSE FOR THE INSTALLATION AND MAINTENANCE OF
RESIDENTIAL ROOFTOP SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS; AND
(2) ESTABLISH MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS FOR INDIVIDUALS
INSTALLING AND MAINTAINING RESIDENTIAL ROOFTOP SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS.
(D) A SELLER OR LESSOR WHO VIOLATES THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION SHALL PAY A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
Article – State Government
9–2017.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, TO ASSIST THE STATE IN MEETING
ITS SOLAR ENERGY COMMITMENTS UNDER TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE PUBLIC
UTILITIES ARTICLE, THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING, SHALL
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
UPDATE THE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE SMARTDG+ TOOL TO INCLUDE STATE–OWNED
LAND SUITABLE FOR SOLAR ENERGY DEVELOPMENT.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION,
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING,
SHALL ANALYZE LAND OWNED BY THE STATE TO IDENTIFY LAND SUITABLE FOR
SOLAR ENERGY DEVELOPMENT TO ASSIST THE STATE IN MEETING ITS SOLAR
ENERGY COMMITMENTS UNDER TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a study to establish a process by
which the Commission may establish power purchase agreements, partnerships between
electric companies and electricity suppliers, or other procurement models for electricity
generation projects.
(b) The process established under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) include a method for determining whether a partnership for a
generating station any of the procurement models specified in subsection (a) of this section
will contribute to resource adequacy by increasing by 100 megawatts or more the electricity
supply in the State that is accredited by PJM Interconnection, LLC;
(2) require that a generating station constructed by a partnership under
any of the procurement models specified in subsection (a) of this section be connected to the
electric distribution system in the State;
(3) require that the an electricity supplier in a partnership with an electric
company construct the generating station;
(4) require that the an electricity supplier and electric company in a
partnership using a procurement model specified in subsection (a) of this section jointly
seek and receive a positive credit rating assessment from a credit rating agency;
(5) require that the Public Service Commission expedite all proceedings for
the review and approval of a certificate of public convenience and necessity for a generating
station proposed by a partnership under any of the procurement models specified in
subsection (a) of this section and prioritize these proceedings, if necessary, over other
matters;
(6) require that the Public Service Commission take final action on a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for a generating station proposed by a
partnership under any of the procurement models specified in subsection (a) of this section
– 35 –

Ch. 624 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
not later than 180 days after the Public Service Commission determines that the generating
station qualifies as a partnership to procurement model will provide resource adequacy;
(7) require a State agency or other person to submit any filing to intervene
in an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity for a generating
station proposed by a partnership under any of the procurement models specified in
subsection (a) of this section no later than 90 days after the Public Service Commission
determines that the proposed generating station qualifies as a partnership to procurement
model will provide resource adequacy;
(8) require the Public Service Commission, the Department of the
Environment, the Department of Natural Resources, and any other impacted State agency
to expedite any regulatory requirements or decisions;
(9) require an electric company to expedite any processes needed to connect
a generating station proposed by a partnership under any of the procurement models
specified in subsection (a) of this section to the electric transmission system; and
(10) identify the potential rate impact and prioritize potential partnerships
procurement models specified in subsection (a) of this section that have little or no impact
on customer rates.
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall report to
the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly on the results of the study.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a study on the feasibility of and
technical barriers to establishing within the Commission a community solar automatic
enrollment program for local jurisdictions.
(b) In conducting the study under subsection (a) of this section, the Commission
shall consider:
(1) how low– to moderate–income subscribers would be subscribed under
the program;
(2) whether subscribers automatically enrolled in the program should
receive a bill credit;
(3) how to ensure that local jurisdictions comply with all parameters of the
program; and
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 624
(4) any necessary notification requirements and consumer protections that
the program should have.
(c) On or before July 1, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly on the results of the study.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act may not
be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or application to the construction or
modification of a solar energy generating system that was submitted for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity from the Public Service Commission or a required permit
from a local government before July 1, 2025.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the meeting and notification
requirements that a proposed solar energy generating system must satisfy under Section 1
of this Act shall be deemed to be satisfied for a proposed solar energy generating system
whose owner, operator, or other person responsible for the system has, on or before June
30, 2025, and in accordance with an existing entitlement process, sent notifications to or
held meetings in the overburdened community or underserved community in which the
system is proposed to be located.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That provisions relating to §
7–207.4 of the Public Utilities Article in Section 1 of this Act may not be applied or
interpreted to have any effect on or application to the construction or modification of any
solar energy generating system for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity
or other required approval was obtained before the effective date of the regulations adopted
by the Public Service Commission under § 7–207.4(c) of the Public Utilities Article, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 4. 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 37 –